src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    villa+V+Inf: villa
    villa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: villaður
    villa+V+Sup: [villað, vilt]
    villleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: villleiðir
    villleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: villleiddu
    villleiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: villleiddi
    villleiða+V+Inf: villleiða
    villleiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: villleiddur
    villleiða+V+Sup: villleitt
    virða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: virðir
    virða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: virdu
    virða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: virdi
    virða+V+Inf: virða
    virða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: virdur
    virða+V+Sup: virt
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [virðislønar, virðislønir]
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [virðislønaðu, virðisløntu]
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: virðislønaði
    virðisløna+V+Inf: virðisløna
    virðisløna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: virðislønaður
    virðisløna+V+Sup: [virðislønað, virðislønt]
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: virðismetir
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: virðismettu
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: virðismetti
    virðismeta+V+Inf: virðismeta
    virðismeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: virðismettur
    virðismeta+V+Sup: virðismett
    vitnisføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vitnisførir
    vitnisføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vitnisførdu
    vitnisføra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vitnisførdi
    vitnisføra+V+Inf: vitnisføra
    vitnisføra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vitnisførdur
    vitnisføra+V+Sup: vitnisført
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: viðmælir
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [viðmældu, viðmæltu]
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: viðmældi
    viðmæla+V+Inf: viðmæla
    viðmæla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: viðmældur
    viðmæla+V+Sup: viðmælt
    viðurkenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: viðurkennir
    viðurkenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: viðurkendu
    viðurkenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: viðurkendi
    viðurkenna+V+Inf: viðurkenna
    viðurkenna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: viðurkendur
    viðurkenna+V+Sup: viðurkent
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: várbeitir
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: várbeittu
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: várbeitti
    várbeita+V+Inf: várbeita
    várbeita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: várbeittur
    várbeita+V+Sup: várbeitt
    væla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vælir
    væla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vældu
    væla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vældi
    væla+V+Inf: væla
    væla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vældur
    væla+V+Sup: vælt
    væta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [vætar, vætir]
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [vætaðu, vættu]
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [vætaði, vætti]
    væta+V+Inf: væta
    væta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [vætaður, vættur]
    væta+V+Sup: [vætað, vætt]
    víga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vígir
    víga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vígdu
    víga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vígdi
    víga+V+Inf: víga
    víga+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vígdur
    víga+V+Sup: vígt
    víggirða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: víggirðir
    víggirða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: víggirdu
    víggirða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: víggirdi
    víggirða+V+Inf: víggirða
    víggirða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: víggirdur
    víggirða+V+Sup: víggirt
    vísa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vísir
    vísa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vístu
    vísa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vísti
    vísa+V+Inf: vísa
    vísa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vístur
    vísa+V+Sup: víst
    ynna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [ynnar, ynnir]
    ynna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [ynnaðu, yntu]
    ynna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [ynnaði, ynti]
    ynna+V+Inf: ynna
    ynna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [ynnaður, yntur]
    ynna+V+Sup: [ynnað, ynt]
    yppa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [yppar, yppir]
    yppa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [yppaðu, yptu]
    yppa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: yppaði
    yppa+V+Inf: yppa
    yppa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: yppaður
    yppa+V+Sup: [yppað, ypt]
    yvirhoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: yvirhoyrir
    yvirhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: yvirhoyrdu
    yvirhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: yvirhoyrdi
    yvirhoyra+V+Inf: yvirhoyra
    yvirhoyra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: yvirhoyrdur
    yvirhoyra+V+Sup: yvirhoyrt
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: yvirmetir
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: yvirmettu
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: yvirmetti
    yvirmeta+V+Inf: yvirmeta
    yvirmeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: yvirmettur
    yvirmeta+V+Sup: yvirmett
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ákærir
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ákærdu
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ákærdi
    ákæra+V+Inf: ákæra
    ákæra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ákærdur
    ákæra+V+Sup: ákært
    áminna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: áminnir
    áminna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ámintu
    áminna+V+Inf: áminna
    áminna+V+Sup: ámint
    ámæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ámælir
    ámæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [ámældu, ámæltu]
    ámæla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ámældi
    ámæla+V+Inf: ámæla
    ámæla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ámældur
    ámæla+V+Sup: ámælt
    ávísa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ávísir
    ávísa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ávístu
    ávísa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ávísti
    ávísa+V+Inf: ávísa
    ávísa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ávístur
    ávísa+V+Sup: ávíst
    æla+V+Inf: æla
    æra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [ærar, ærir]
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [æraðu, ærdu]
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [æraði, ærdi]
    æra+V+Inf: æra
    æra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [æraður, ærdur]
    æra+V+Sup: [ærað, ært]
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ærumeiðir
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ærumeiddu
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ærumeiddi
    ærumeiða+V+Inf: ærumeiða
    ærumeiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ærumeiddur
    ærumeiða+V+Sup: ærumeitt
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: æruskemmir
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: æruskemdu
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: æruskemdi
    æruskemma+V+Inf: æruskemma
    æruskemma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: æruskemdur
    æruskemma+V+Sup: æruskemt
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [ættgreinar, ættgreinir]
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [ættgreinaðu, ættgreindu]
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [ættgreinaði, ættgreindi]
    ættgreina+V+Inf: ættgreina
    ættgreina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [ættgreinaður, ættgreindur]
    ættgreina+V+Sup: [ættgreinað, ættgreint]
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ættleiðir
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ættleiddu
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ættleiddi
    ættleiða+V+Inf: ættleiða
    ættleiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ættleiddur
    ættleiða+V+Sup: ættleitt
    ónýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ónýtir
    ónýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ónýttu
    ónýta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ónýtti
    ónýta+V+Inf: ónýta
    ónýta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ónýttur
    ónýta+V+Sup: ónýtt
    óðalsbýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: óðalsbýtir
    óðalsbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: óðalsbýttu
    óðalsbýta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: óðalsbýtti
    óðalsbýta+V+Inf: óðalsbýta
    óðalsbýta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: óðalsbýttur
    óðalsbýta+V+Sup: óðalsbýtt
    øga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: øgir
    øga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: øgdu
    øga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: øgdi
    øga+V+Inf: øga
    øga+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: øgdur
    øga+V+Sup: øgt
    øna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [ønar, ønir]
    øna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [ønaðu, øntu]
    øna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ønaði
    øna+V+Inf: øna
    øna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ønaður
    øna+V+Sup: [ønað, ønt]
    øsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [øsar, øsir]
    øsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [øsaðu, østu]
    øsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [øsaði, østi]
    øsa+V+Inf: øsa
    øsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [øsaður, østur]
    øsa+V+Sup: [øsað, øst]
    øva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [øvar, øvir]
    øva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [øvaðu, øvdu]
    øva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [øvaði, øvdi]
    øva+V+Inf: øva
    øva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [øvaður, øvdur]
    øva+V+Sup: [øvað, øvt]
    øða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: øðir
    øða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: øddu
    øða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: øddi
    øða+V+Inf: øða
    øða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: øddur
    øða+V+Sup: øtt
    úrleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úrleiðir
    úrleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: úrleiddu
    úrleiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: úrleiddi
    úrleiða+V+Inf: úrleiða
    úrleiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: úrleiddur
    úrleiða+V+Sup: úrleitt
    úrløða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úrløðir
    úrløða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: úrløddu
    úrløða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: úrløddi
    úrløða+V+Inf: úrløða
    úrløða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: úrløddur
    úrløða+V+Sup: úrløtt
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úrnýtir
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: úrnýttu
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: úrnýtti
    úrnýta+V+Inf: úrnýta
    úrnýta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: úrnýttur
    úrnýta+V+Sup: úrnýtt
    útgreina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [útgreinar, útgreinir]
    útgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [útgreinaðu, útgreindu]
    útgreina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [útgreinaði, útgreindi]
    útgreina+V+Inf: útgreina
    útgreina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [útgreinaður, útgreindur]
    útgreina+V+Sup: [útgreinað, útgreint]
    úthella+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úthellir
    úthella+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: útheldu
    úthella+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: útheldi
    úthella+V+Inf: úthella
    úthella+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: útheldur
    úthella+V+Sup: úthelt
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: útihýsir
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: útihýstu
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: útihýsti
    útihýsa+V+Inf: útihýsa
    útihýsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: útihýstur
    útihýsa+V+Sup: útihýst
    útinna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: útinnir
    útinna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: útintu
    útinna+V+Inf: útinna
    útinna+V+Sup: útint
    útnevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: útnevnir
    útnevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: útnevndu
    útnevna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: útnevndi
    útnevna+V+Inf: útnevna
    útnevna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: útnevndur
    útnevna+V+Sup: útnevnt
    úttýða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úttýðir
    úttýða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: úttýddu
    úttýða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: úttýddi
    úttýða+V+Inf: úttýða
    úttýða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: úttýddur
    úttýða+V+Sup: úttýtt
    ýla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ýlir
    ýla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ýldu
    ýla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ýldi
    ýla+V+Inf: ýla
    ýla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ýldur
    ýla+V+Sup: ýlt
